Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.440

Commodities sold in bulk—Delivery tickets.

(1) When a vehicle delivers to an individual purchaser a commodity in bulk, and the commodity is sold in terms of weight units, the delivery must be accompanied by a duplicate delivery ticket with the following information clearly stated, in ink or other indelible marking equipment and, in clarity, equal to type or printing:

(a) The name and address of the vendor;

(b) The name and address of the purchaser; and

(c) The weight of the delivery expressed in pounds, and, if the weight is derived from determinations of gross and tare weights, such gross and tare weights also must be stated in terms of pounds.

(2) One of the delivery tickets shall be retained by the vendor, and the other shall be delivered to the purchaser at the time of delivery of the commodity, or shall be surrendered on demand to the director or the city sealer who, if he or she elects to retain it as evidence, shall issue a weight slip in lieu thereof for delivery to the purchaser.

(3) If the purchaser himself or herself carries away the purchase, the vendor shall be required only to give the purchaser at the time of sale a delivery ticket stating the number of pounds of commodity delivered.

[ 1992 c 237 s 27; 1991 sp.s. c 23 s 18; 1969 c 67 s 44.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Intent—1991 sp.s. c 23: See notes following RCW 19.94.150.